Utah statutes.
15-8-12.   Lessor's defenses.
(1)  If a lessor established by a preponderance of evidence that a violation
of this chapter is unintentional or the result of a bona fide error, no
penalty specified in Section 15-8-11 may be imposed and the validity of the
transaction is not affected.
(2)  A lessor has no liability under this part for any failure to comply with
any requirement imposed under this chapter if, within 60 days after
discovering an error, and prior to the institution of an action under this
chapter or the receipt of written notice of the error from the consumer, the
lessor notifies the affected consumer of the error and makes whatever
adjustments in the consumer's account as are necessary to correct the error.
(3)  A penalty does not apply if any action is performed or omitted in good
faith and in conformity with any provision of this chapter, notwithstanding
that after an action or omission has occurred, the provision of the chapter
is, for any reason, amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other
competent authority to be invalid.
